Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXI Agriculture and Animals
CHAPTER 247 Promotion of Agriculture
and Horticulture

247.010.
Definitions for chapter.

As used in this chapter, unless the context requires otherwise:

“Board” means the State Board of Agriculture;

“Commissioner” means Commissioner of Agriculture;

“Department” means the Department of Agriculture; and

“Livestock” means cattle, sheep, swine, goats, horses, alpacas, llamas, buffaloes, or any other animals of the bovine, ovine, porcine, caprine, equine, or camelid species.

HISTORY:

2017 ch. 129, § 16, effective June 29, 2017.

247.015.
Department authorized to provide space on state property for sale of Kentucky agricultural commodities — Administrative regulations — Applicability.

It is hereby declared to be in the public interest and for the public health and welfare that the State Department of Agriculture shall have the authority to provide space on all state property, in cooperation with the appropriate state agency under whose jurisdiction the said real property falls, for those nonprofit agricultural commodity organizations designated in section 501(c)(5) of the Federal Internal Revenue Code to sell, give away, advertise, or promote Kentucky agricultural commodities.

The department shall, in cooperation with other state agencies, develop administrative regulations to carry out the provisions of subsection (1) of this section, which may include a reasonable fee to be paid by the agricultural organization.

This section shall not apply to existing contracts prior to July 15, 1986, but shall apply to contract renewals and to new contracts after July 15, 1986.

History.

Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 460, § 1, effective July 15, 1986.